Illinois, session 104th, HB1040.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/7.5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-724)8    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for 9by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 10exempt from inspection and copying:11        (a) All information determined to be confidential 12    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 13    Development Act.14        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 15    library users with specific materials under the Library 16    Records Confidentiality Act.17        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 18    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 19    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 20    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 21    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 22    has received.23        (d) Information and records held by the Department of   HB1040- 2 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 2    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 3    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 4    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 5    Infection Control Act.6        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 7    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.8        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 9    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 10    Qualifications Based Selection Act.11        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 12    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 13    Tuition Act.14        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 15    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 16    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 17    general's office that would be exempt if created or 18    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 19    that Act.20        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 21    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 22    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 23    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.24        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 25    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 26    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.  HB1040- 3 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 2    or driver identification information compiled by a law 3    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 4    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.5        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 6    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 7    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 8    Prevention Review Team Act.9        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 10    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 11    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent 12    authorized under that Article.13        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 14    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 15    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 16    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 17    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 18    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 19    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.20        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 21    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 22    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.23        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 24    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 25    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 26    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and   HB1040- 4 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 2    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 3    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 4    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 5    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 6    Act (repealed). 7        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 8    Personnel Record Review Act. 9        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 10    Illinois School Student Records Act. 11        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 12    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 13        (t) (Blank). 14        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 15    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 16    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 17        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 18    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 19    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 20    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 21    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 22    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 23    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 24    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 25    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 26    Firearm Concealed Carry Act.   HB1040- 5 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 2    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 3    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.4        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 5    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 6    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.7        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 8    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 9    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 10        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 11    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling 12    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 13    information about the identity and administrative finding 14    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 15    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 16    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 17    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 18        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 19    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 20    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 21    Act. 22        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 23    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 24        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 25    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 26        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement   HB1040- 6 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 2    authorized under that Act.3        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 4    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 5    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 6        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 7    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 8        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 9    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 10        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 11    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle 12    Code. 13        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 14    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 15        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 16    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 17    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 19    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 20    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 21    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 22    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 23        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 24    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 25        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 26    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public   HB1040- 7 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Aid Code. 2        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 3    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 4        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 6        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 7    arising out of a peer support counseling session 8    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 9    Suicide Prevention Act. 10        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 11    an employee of an emergency services provider or law 12    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 13    Prevention Act. 14        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 15    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 16    under the Reproductive Health Act. 17        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 18    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 19        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 20    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 21    Human Rights Act.22        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 23    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 24    Act. 25        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 26    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act.   HB1040- 8 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 2    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 3    Public Aid Code. 4        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 5    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 6        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 7    information that shall not be made public under the 8    Illinois Insurance Code. 9        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 10    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.11        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 12    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 13        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 14    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 15        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 16    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 17    Police Act. 18        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 19    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 20    Administrative Code of Illinois. 21        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 22    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 23    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 24    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 25        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 26    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic   HB1040- 9 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Violence Fatality Review Act. 2        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 3    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 4    July 1, 2025. 5        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 6    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 7    Agency Licensing Act. 8        (hhh) Information submitted to the Illinois State 9    Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 10    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 11    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge 12    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 13    Act. 14        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 15    the School Safety Drill Act. 16        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 17    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 18        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 19    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 20    Act. 21        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 22    2-3.196 of the School Code. 23        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 24    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 25    Power Agency Act. 26        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce   HB1040- 10 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 2    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 3        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 4    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 5    Act. 6        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 7    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 8    Act. 9        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 10    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 11        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being 12    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 13    Transmission Modernization Act. 14(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 15102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 168-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 17102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 186-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 20103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-786, eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, 22eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; 23revised 10-10-24.) 24    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-724)25    Sec. 7.5. Statutory exemptions. To the extent provided for   HB1040- 11 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1by the statutes referenced below, the following shall be 2exempt from inspection and copying:3        (a) All information determined to be confidential 4    under Section 4002 of the Technology Advancement and 5    Development Act.6        (b) Library circulation and order records identifying 7    library users with specific materials under the Library 8    Records Confidentiality Act.9        (c) Applications, related documents, and medical 10    records received by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 11    Procedures Board and any and all documents or other 12    records prepared by the Experimental Organ Transplantation 13    Procedures Board or its staff relating to applications it 14    has received.15        (d) Information and records held by the Department of 16    Public Health and its authorized representatives relating 17    to known or suspected cases of sexually transmitted 18    infection or any information the disclosure of which is 19    restricted under the Illinois Sexually Transmitted 20    Infection Control Act.21        (e) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 22    under Section 30 of the Radon Industry Licensing Act.23        (f) Firm performance evaluations under Section 55 of 24    the Architectural, Engineering, and Land Surveying 25    Qualifications Based Selection Act.26        (g) Information the disclosure of which is restricted   HB1040- 12 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    and exempted under Section 50 of the Illinois Prepaid 2    Tuition Act.3        (h) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 4    under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, and 5    records of any lawfully created State or local inspector 6    general's office that would be exempt if created or 7    obtained by an Executive Inspector General's office under 8    that Act.9        (i) Information contained in a local emergency energy 10    plan submitted to a municipality in accordance with a 11    local emergency energy plan ordinance that is adopted 12    under Section 11-21.5-5 of the Illinois Municipal Code.13        (j) Information and data concerning the distribution 14    of surcharge moneys collected and remitted by carriers 15    under the Emergency Telephone System Act.16        (k) Law enforcement officer identification information 17    or driver identification information compiled by a law 18    enforcement agency or the Department of Transportation 19    under Section 11-212 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.20        (l) Records and information provided to a residential 21    health care facility resident sexual assault and death 22    review team or the Executive Council under the Abuse 23    Prevention Review Team Act.24        (m) Information provided to the predatory lending 25    database created pursuant to Article 3 of the Residential 26    Real Property Disclosure Act, except to the extent   HB1040- 13 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    authorized under that Article.2        (n) Defense budgets and petitions for certification of 3    compensation and expenses for court appointed trial 4    counsel as provided under Sections 10 and 15 of the 5    Capital Crimes Litigation Act (repealed). This subsection 6    (n) shall apply until the conclusion of the trial of the 7    case, even if the prosecution chooses not to pursue the 8    death penalty prior to trial or sentencing.9        (o) Information that is prohibited from being 10    disclosed under Section 4 of the Illinois Health and 11    Hazardous Substances Registry Act.12        (p) Security portions of system safety program plans, 13    investigation reports, surveys, schedules, lists, data, or 14    information compiled, collected, or prepared by or for the 15    Department of Transportation under Sections 2705-300 and 16    2705-616 of the Department of Transportation Law of the 17    Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, the Regional 18    Transportation Authority under Section 2.11 of the 19    Regional Transportation Authority Act, or the St. Clair 20    County Transit District under the Bi-State Transit Safety 21    Act (repealed). 22        (q) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 23    Personnel Record Review Act. 24        (r) Information prohibited from being disclosed by the 25    Illinois School Student Records Act. 26        (s) Information the disclosure of which is restricted   HB1040- 14 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    under Section 5-108 of the Public Utilities Act. 2        (t) (Blank). 3        (u) Records and information provided to an independent 4    team of experts under the Developmental Disability and 5    Mental Health Safety Act (also known as Brian's Law). 6        (v) Names and information of people who have applied 7    for or received Firearm Owner's Identification Cards under 8    the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act or applied for 9    or received a concealed carry license under the Firearm 10    Concealed Carry Act, unless otherwise authorized by the 11    Firearm Concealed Carry Act; and databases under the 12    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, records of the Concealed 13    Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm Concealed 14    Carry Act, and law enforcement agency objections under the 15    Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 16        (v-5) Records of the Firearm Owner's Identification 17    Card Review Board that are exempted from disclosure under 18    Section 10 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.19        (w) Personally identifiable information which is 20    exempted from disclosure under subsection (g) of Section 21    19.1 of the Toll Highway Act.22        (x) Information which is exempted from disclosure 23    under Section 5-1014.3 of the Counties Code or Section 24    8-11-21 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 25        (y) Confidential information under the Adult 26    Protective Services Act and its predecessor enabling   HB1040- 15 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    statute, the Elder Abuse and Neglect Act, including 2    information about the identity and administrative finding 3    against any caregiver of a verified and substantiated 4    decision of abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 5    an eligible adult maintained in the Registry established 6    under Section 7.5 of the Adult Protective Services Act. 7        (z) Records and information provided to a fatality 8    review team or the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 9    Council under Section 15 of the Adult Protective Services 10    Act. 11        (aa) Information which is exempted from disclosure 12    under Section 2.37 of the Wildlife Code. 13        (bb) Information which is or was prohibited from 14    disclosure by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. 15        (cc) Recordings made under the Law Enforcement 16    Officer-Worn Body Camera Act, except to the extent 17    authorized under that Act.18        (dd) Information that is prohibited from being 19    disclosed under Section 45 of the Condominium and Common 20    Interest Community Ombudsperson Act. 21        (ee) Information that is exempted from disclosure 22    under Section 30.1 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 23        (ff) Information that is exempted from disclosure 24    under the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. 25        (gg) Information that is prohibited from being 26    disclosed under Section 7-603.5 of the Illinois Vehicle   HB1040- 16 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Code. 2        (hh) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 3    Section 1A-16.7 of the Election Code. 4        (ii) Information which is exempted from disclosure 5    under Section 2505-800 of the Department of Revenue Law of 6    the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 7        (jj) Information and reports that are required to be 8    submitted to the Department of Labor by registering day 9    and temporary labor service agencies but are exempt from 10    disclosure under subsection (a-1) of Section 45 of the Day 11    and Temporary Labor Services Act. 12        (kk) Information prohibited from disclosure under the 13    Seizure and Forfeiture Reporting Act. 14        (ll) Information the disclosure of which is restricted 15    and exempted under Section 5-30.8 of the Illinois Public 16    Aid Code. 17        (mm) Records that are exempt from disclosure under 18    Section 4.2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 19        (nn) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 70 of the Higher Education Student Assistance Act. 21        (oo) Communications, notes, records, and reports 22    arising out of a peer support counseling session 23    prohibited from disclosure under the First Responders 24    Suicide Prevention Act. 25        (pp) Names and all identifying information relating to 26    an employee of an emergency services provider or law   HB1040- 17 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    enforcement agency under the First Responders Suicide 2    Prevention Act. 3        (qq) Information and records held by the Department of 4    Public Health and its authorized representatives collected 5    under the Reproductive Health Act. 6        (rr) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 7    the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 8        (ss) Data reported by an employer to the Department of 9    Human Rights pursuant to Section 2-108 of the Illinois 10    Human Rights Act.11        (tt) Recordings made under the Children's Advocacy 12    Center Act, except to the extent authorized under that 13    Act. 14        (uu) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 15    Section 50 of the Sexual Assault Evidence Submission Act. 16        (vv) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 17    subsections (f) and (j) of Section 5-36 of the Illinois 18    Public Aid Code. 19        (ww) Information that is exempt from disclosure under 20    Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 21        (xx) Information that is exempt from disclosure or 22    information that shall not be made public under the 23    Illinois Insurance Code. 24        (yy) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 25    the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.26        (zz) Information prohibited from being disclosed under   HB1040- 18 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 2        (aaa) Information prohibited from being disclosed 3    under Section 1-167 of the Illinois Pension Code. 4        (bbb) Information that is prohibited from disclosure 5    by the Illinois Police Training Act and the Illinois State 6    Police Act. 7        (ccc) Records exempt from disclosure under Section 8    2605-304 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 9    Administrative Code of Illinois. 10        (ddd) Information prohibited from being disclosed 11    under Section 35 of the Address Confidentiality for 12    Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual Assault, Human 13    Trafficking, or Stalking Act. 14        (eee) Information prohibited from being disclosed 15    under subsection (b) of Section 75 of the Domestic 16    Violence Fatality Review Act. 17        (fff) Images from cameras under the Expressway Camera 18    Act. This subsection (fff) is inoperative on and after 19    July 1, 2025. 20        (ggg) Information prohibited from disclosure under 21    paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Section 14 of the Nurse 22    Agency Licensing Act. 23        (hhh) (Blank). Information submitted to the Illinois 24    State Police in an affidavit or application for an assault 25    weapon endorsement, assault weapon attachment endorsement, 26    .50 caliber rifle endorsement, or .50 caliber cartridge   HB1040- 19 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    endorsement under the Firearm Owners Identification Card 2    Act. 3        (iii) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 50 of 4    the School Safety Drill Act. 5        (jjj) Information exempt from disclosure under Section 6    30 of the Insurance Data Security Law. 7        (kkk) Confidential business information prohibited 8    from disclosure under Section 45 of the Paint Stewardship 9    Act. 10        (lll) Data exempt from disclosure under Section 11    2-3.196 of the School Code. 12        (mmm) Information prohibited from being disclosed 13    under subsection (e) of Section 1-129 of the Illinois 14    Power Agency Act. 15        (nnn) Materials received by the Department of Commerce 16    and Economic Opportunity that are confidential under the 17    Music and Musicians Tax Credit and Jobs Act. 18        (ooo) (nnn) Data or information provided pursuant to 19    Section 20 of the Statewide Recycling Needs and Assessment 20    Act. 21        (ppp) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 22    under Section 28-11 of the Lawful Health Care Activity 23    Act. 24        (qqq) (nnn) Information that is exempt from disclosure 25    under Section 7-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act. 26        (rrr) (mmm) Information prohibited from being   HB1040- 20 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    disclosed under Section 4-2 of the Uniform Money 2    Transmission Modernization Act. 3        (sss) (nnn) Information exempt from disclosure under 4    Section 40 of the Student-Athlete Endorsement Rights Act.5(Source: P.A. 102-36, eff. 6-25-21; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-292, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 102-559, eff. 78-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 8102-1042, eff. 6-3-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 103-8, eff. 96-7-23; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23; 103-142, eff. 1-1-24; 103-372, 10eff. 1-1-24; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-508, eff. 8-4-23; 11103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 127-1-24; 103-636, eff. 7-1-24; 103-724, eff. 1-1-25; 103-786, 13eff. 8-7-24; 103-859, eff. 8-9-24; 103-991, eff. 8-9-24; 14103-1049, eff. 8-9-24; revised 10-10-24.) 15    Section 10. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 16amended by changing Section 8 as follows: 17    (430 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-8)18    Sec. 8. Grounds for denial and revocation. The Illinois 19State Police has authority to deny an application for or to 20revoke and seize a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 21previously issued under this Act only if the Illinois State 22Police finds that the applicant or the person to whom such card 23was issued is or was at the time of issuance:24        (a) A person under 21 years of age who has been   HB1040- 21 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    convicted of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or 2    adjudged delinquent;3        (b) This subsection (b) applies through the 180th day 4    following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 5    101-80). A person under 21 years of age who does not have 6    the written consent of his parent or guardian to acquire 7    and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or whose 8    parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, or 9    where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 10    Firearm Owner's Identification Card;11        (b-5) This subsection (b-5) applies on and after the 12    181st day following July 12, 2019 (the effective date of 13    Public Act 101-80). A person under 21 years of age who is 14    not an active duty member of the United States Armed 15    Forces or the Illinois National Guard and does not have 16    the written consent of his or her parent or guardian to 17    acquire and possess firearms and firearm ammunition, or 18    whose parent or guardian has revoked such written consent, 19    or where such parent or guardian does not qualify to have a 20    Firearm Owner's Identification Card; 21        (c) A person convicted of a felony under the laws of 22    this or any other jurisdiction;23        (d) A person addicted to narcotics;24        (e) A person who has been a patient of a mental health 25    facility within the past 5 years or a person who has been a 26    patient in a mental health facility more than 5 years ago   HB1040- 22 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    who has not received the certification required under 2    subsection (u) of this Section. An active law enforcement 3    officer employed by a unit of government or a Department 4    of Corrections employee authorized to possess firearms who 5    is denied, revoked, or has his or her Firearm Owner's 6    Identification Card seized under this subsection (e) may 7    obtain relief as described in subsection (c-5) of Section 8    10 of this Act if the officer or employee did not act in a 9    manner threatening to the officer or employee, another 10    person, or the public as determined by the treating 11    clinical psychologist or physician, and the officer or 12    employee seeks mental health treatment;13        (f) A person whose mental condition is of such a 14    nature that it poses a clear and present danger to the 15    applicant, any other person or persons, or the community;16        (g) A person who has an intellectual disability;17        (h) A person who intentionally makes a false statement 18    in the Firearm Owner's Identification Card application or 19    endorsement affidavit;20        (i) A noncitizen who is unlawfully present in the 21    United States under the laws of the United States;22        (i-5) A noncitizen who has been admitted to the United 23    States under a non-immigrant visa (as that term is defined 24    in Section 101(a)(26) of the Immigration and Nationality 25    Act (8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(26))), except that this subsection 26    (i-5) does not apply to any noncitizen who has been   HB1040- 23 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    lawfully admitted to the United States under a 2    non-immigrant visa if that noncitizen is:3            (1) admitted to the United States for lawful 4        hunting or sporting purposes;5            (2) an official representative of a foreign 6        government who is:7                (A) accredited to the United States Government 8            or the Government's mission to an international 9            organization having its headquarters in the United 10            States; or11                (B) en route to or from another country to 12            which that noncitizen is accredited;13            (3) an official of a foreign government or 14        distinguished foreign visitor who has been so 15        designated by the Department of State;16            (4) a foreign law enforcement officer of a 17        friendly foreign government entering the United States 18        on official business; or19            (5) one who has received a waiver from the 20        Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 18 21        U.S.C. 922(y)(3);22        (j) (Blank);23        (k) A person who has been convicted within the past 5 24    years of battery, assault, aggravated assault, violation 25    of an order of protection, or a substantially similar 26    offense in another jurisdiction, in which a firearm was   HB1040- 24 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    used or possessed;2        (l) A person who has been convicted of domestic 3    battery, aggravated domestic battery, or a substantially 4    similar offense in another jurisdiction committed before, 5    on or after January 1, 2012 (the effective date of Public 6    Act 97-158). If the applicant or person who has been 7    previously issued a Firearm Owner's Identification Card 8    under this Act knowingly and intelligently waives the 9    right to have an offense described in this paragraph (l) 10    tried by a jury, and by guilty plea or otherwise, results 11    in a conviction for an offense in which a domestic 12    relationship is not a required element of the offense but 13    in which a determination of the applicability of 18 U.S.C. 14    922(g)(9) is made under Section 112A-11.1 of the Code of 15    Criminal Procedure of 1963, an entry by the court of a 16    judgment of conviction for that offense shall be grounds 17    for denying an application for and for revoking and 18    seizing a Firearm Owner's Identification Card previously 19    issued to the person under this Act;20        (m) (Blank);21        (n) A person who is prohibited from acquiring or 22    possessing firearms or firearm ammunition by any Illinois 23    State statute or by federal law;24        (o) A minor subject to a petition filed under Section 25    5-520 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 alleging that the 26    minor is a delinquent minor for the commission of an   HB1040- 25 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    offense that if committed by an adult would be a felony; 2        (p) An adult who had been adjudicated a delinquent 3    minor under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for the 4    commission of an offense that if committed by an adult 5    would be a felony;6        (q) A person who is not a resident of the State of 7    Illinois, except as provided in subsection (a-10) of 8    Section 4; 9        (r) A person who has been adjudicated as a person with 10    a mental disability; 11        (s) A person who has been found to have a 12    developmental disability; 13        (t) A person involuntarily admitted into a mental 14    health facility; or 15        (u) A person who has had his or her Firearm Owner's 16    Identification Card revoked or denied under subsection (e) 17    of this Section or item (iv) of paragraph (2) of 18    subsection (a) of Section 4 of this Act because he or she 19    was a patient in a mental health facility as provided in 20    subsection (e) of this Section, shall not be permitted to 21    obtain a Firearm Owner's Identification Card, after the 22    5-year period has lapsed, unless he or she has received a 23    mental health evaluation by a physician, clinical 24    psychologist, or qualified examiner as those terms are 25    defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 26    Disabilities Code, and has received a certification that   HB1040- 26 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    he or she is not a clear and present danger to himself, 2    herself, or others. The physician, clinical psychologist, 3    or qualified examiner making the certification and his or 4    her employer shall not be held criminally, civilly, or 5    professionally liable for making or not making the 6    certification required under this subsection, except for 7    willful or wanton misconduct. This subsection does not 8    apply to a person whose firearm possession rights have 9    been restored through administrative or judicial action 10    under Section 10 or 11 of this Act. 11    Upon revocation of a person's Firearm Owner's 12Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall provide 13notice to the person and the person shall comply with Section 149.5 of this Act. 15(Source: P.A. 101-80, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-645, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 175-27-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 18    (430 ILCS 65/4.1 rep.)19    Section 15. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 20amended by repealing Section 4.1. 21    Section 20. The Firearms Restraining Order Act is amended 22by changing Sections 40, 45, and 55 as follows: 23    (430 ILCS 67/40)  HB1040- 27 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    Sec. 40. Plenary Six-month orders. 2    (a) A petitioner may request a 6-month firearms 3restraining order for up to one year by filing an affidavit or 4verified pleading alleging that the respondent poses a 5significant danger of causing personal injury to himself, 6herself, or another in the near future by having in his or her 7custody or control, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a 8firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled 9to make an operable firearm. The petition shall also describe 10the number, types, and locations of any firearms, ammunition, 11and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 12firearm presently believed by the petitioner to be possessed 13or controlled by the respondent. The firearms restraining 14order may be renewed for an additional period of up to one year 15in accordance with Section 45 of this Act. 16    (b) If the respondent is alleged to pose a significant 17danger of causing personal injury to an intimate partner, or 18an intimate partner is alleged to have been the target of a 19threat or act of violence by the respondent, the petitioner 20shall make a good faith effort to provide notice to any and all 21intimate partners of the respondent. The notice must include 22the duration of time that the petitioner intends to petition 23the court for a 6-month firearms restraining order, and, if 24the petitioner is a law enforcement officer, referral to 25relevant domestic violence or stalking advocacy or counseling 26resources, if appropriate. The petitioner shall attest to   HB1040- 28 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1having provided the notice in the filed affidavit or verified 2pleading. If, after making a good faith effort, the petitioner 3is unable to provide notice to any or all intimate partners, 4the affidavit or verified pleading should describe what 5efforts were made.6    (c) Every person who files a petition for a plenary 76-month firearms restraining order, knowing the information 8provided to the court at any hearing or in the affidavit or 9verified pleading to be false, is guilty of perjury under 10Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 11    (d) Upon receipt of a petition for a plenary 6-month 12firearms restraining order, the court shall order a hearing 13within 30 days. 14    (e) In determining whether to issue a firearms restraining 15order under this Section, the court shall consider evidence 16including, but not limited to, the following: 17        (1) The unlawful and reckless use, display, or 18    brandishing of a firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts 19    that could be assembled to make an operable firearm by the 20    respondent. 21        (2) The history of use, attempted use, or threatened 22    use of physical force by the respondent against another 23    person. 24        (3) Any prior arrest of the respondent for a felony 25    offense.26        (4) Evidence of the abuse of controlled substances or   HB1040- 29 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    alcohol by the respondent.2        (5) A recent threat of violence or act of violence by 3    the respondent directed toward himself, herself, or 4    another.5        (6) A violation of an emergency order of protection 6    issued under Section 217 of the Illinois Domestic Violence 7    Act of 1986 or Section 112A-17 of the Code of Criminal 8    Procedure of 1963 or of an order of protection issued 9    under Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 10    1986 or Section 112A-14 of the Code of Criminal Procedure 11    of 1963. 12        (7) A pattern of violent acts or violent threats, 13    including, but not limited to, threats of violence or acts 14    of violence by the respondent directed toward himself, 15    herself, or another.16    (f) At the hearing, the petitioner shall have the burden 17of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that the 18respondent poses a significant danger of personal injury to 19himself, herself, or another by having in his or her custody or 20control, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, 21ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 22an operable firearm.23    (g) If the court finds that there is clear and convincing 24evidence to issue a plenary firearms restraining order, the 25court shall issue a firearms restraining order that shall be 26in effect for up to one year, but not less than 6 months, 6   HB1040- 30 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1months subject to renewal under Section 45 of this Act or 2termination under that Section. 3    (g-5) If the court issues a plenary 6-month firearms 4restraining order, it shall, upon a finding of probable cause 5that the respondent possesses firearms, ammunition, and 6firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 7firearm, issue a search warrant directing a law enforcement 8agency to seize the respondent's firearms, ammunition, and 9firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 10firearm. The court may, as part of that warrant, direct the law 11enforcement agency to search the respondent's residence and 12other places where the court finds there is probable cause to 13believe he or she is likely to possess the firearms, 14ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 15an operable firearm. A return of the search warrant shall be 16filed by the law enforcement agency within 4 days thereafter, 17setting forth the time, date, and location that the search 18warrant was executed and what items, if any, were seized. 19    (h) A plenary 6-month firearms restraining order shall 20require:21        (1) the respondent to refrain from having in his or 22    her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, or 23    receiving additional firearms, ammunition, and firearm 24    parts that could be assembled to make an operable firearm 25    for the duration of the order under Section 8.2 of the 26    Firearm Owners Identification Card Act; and  HB1040- 31 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (2) the respondent to comply with Section 9.5 of the 2    Firearm Owners Identification Card Act and subsection (g) 3    of Section 70 of the Firearm Concealed Carry Act.4    (i) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (i-5) of 5this Section, upon expiration of the period of safekeeping, if 6the firearms, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be 7assembled to make an operable firearm or Firearm Owner's 8Identification Card cannot be returned to the respondent 9because the respondent cannot be located, fails to respond to 10requests to retrieve the firearms, ammunition, and firearm 11parts that could be assembled to make an operable firearm, or 12is not lawfully eligible to possess a firearm, ammunition, and 13firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable 14firearm, upon petition from the local law enforcement agency, 15the court may order the local law enforcement agency to 16destroy the firearms, ammunition, and firearm parts that could 17be assembled to make an operable firearm, use the firearms, 18ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 19an operable firearm for training purposes, or use the 20firearms, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be 21assembled to make an operable firearm for any other 22application as deemed appropriate by the local law enforcement 23agency.24    (i-5) A respondent whose Firearm Owner's Identification 25Card has been revoked or suspended may petition the court, if 26the petitioner is present in court or has notice of the   HB1040- 32 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1respondent's petition, to transfer the respondent's firearm, 2ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 3an operable firearm to a person who is lawfully able to possess 4the firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be 5assembled to make an operable firearm if the person does not 6reside at the same address as the respondent. Notice of the 7petition shall be served upon the person protected by the 8emergency firearms restraining order. While the order is in 9effect, the transferee who receives the respondent's firearms, 10ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 11an operable firearm must swear or affirm by affidavit that he 12or she shall not transfer the firearm, ammunition, and firearm 13parts that could be assembled to make an operable firearm to 14the respondent or to anyone residing in the same residence as 15the respondent.16    (i-6) If a person other than the respondent claims title 17to any firearms, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be 18assembled to make an operable firearm surrendered under this 19Section, he or she may petition the court, if the petitioner is 20present in court or has notice of the petition, to have the 21firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled 22to make an operable firearm returned to him or her. If the 23court determines that person to be the lawful owner of the 24firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled 25to make an operable firearm, the firearm, ammunition, and 26firearm parts that could be assembled to make an operable   HB1040- 33 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1firearm shall be returned to him or her, provided that:2        (1) the firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that 3    could be assembled to make an operable firearm are removed 4    from the respondent's custody, control, or possession and 5    the lawful owner agrees to store the firearm, ammunition, 6    and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 7    operable firearm in a manner such that the respondent does 8    not have access to or control of the firearm, ammunition, 9    and firearm parts that could be assembled to make an 10    operable firearm; and11        (2) the firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that 12    could be assembled to make an operable firearm are not 13    otherwise unlawfully possessed by the owner.14    The person petitioning for the return of his or her 15firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled 16to make an operable firearm must swear or affirm by affidavit 17that he or she: (i) is the lawful owner of the firearm, 18ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 19an operable firearm; (ii) shall not transfer the firearm, 20ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 21an operable firearm to the respondent; and (iii) will store 22the firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that could be 23assembled to make an operable firearm in a manner that the 24respondent does not have access to or control of the firearm, 25ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to make 26an operable firearm.   HB1040- 34 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    (j) If the court does not issue a firearms restraining 2order at the hearing, the court shall dissolve any emergency 3firearms restraining order then in effect.4    (k) When the court issues a firearms restraining order 5under this Section, the court shall inform the respondent that 6he or she is entitled to one hearing during the period of the 7order to request a termination of the order, under Section 45 8of this Act, and shall provide the respondent with a form to 9request a hearing. 10(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-345, eff. 6-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 125-13-22; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 13    (430 ILCS 67/45)14    Sec. 45. Termination and renewal. 15    (a) A person subject to a firearms restraining order 16issued under this Act may submit one written request at any 17time during the effective period of the order for a hearing to 18terminate the order.19        (1) The respondent shall have the burden of proving by 20    a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent does 21    not pose a danger of causing personal injury to himself, 22    herself, or another in the near future by having in his or 23    her custody or control, purchasing, possessing, or 24    receiving a firearm, ammunition, and firearm parts that 25    could be assembled to make an operable firearm.  HB1040- 35 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (2) If the court finds after the hearing that the 2    respondent has met his or her burden, the court shall 3    terminate the order. 4    (b) A petitioner may request a renewal of a firearms 5restraining order at any time within the 3 months before the 6expiration of a firearms restraining order.7        (1) A court shall, after notice and a hearing, renew a 8    firearms restraining order issued under this part if the 9    petitioner proves, by clear and convincing evidence, that 10    the respondent continues to pose a danger of causing 11    personal injury to himself, herself, or another in the 12    near future by having in his or her custody or control, 13    purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, 14    ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to 15    make an operable firearm.16        (2) In determining whether to renew a firearms 17    restraining order issued under this Act, the court shall 18    consider evidence of the facts identified in subsection 19    (e) of Section 40 of this Act and any other evidence of an 20    increased risk for violence. 21        (3) At the hearing, the petitioner shall have the 22    burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that 23    the respondent continues to pose a danger of causing 24    personal injury to himself, herself, or another in the 25    near future by having in his or her custody or control, 26    purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm,   HB1040- 36 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    ammunition, and firearm parts that could be assembled to 2    make an operable firearm.3        (4) The renewal of a firearms restraining order issued 4    under this Section shall be in effect for 6 months up to 5    one year and may be renewed for an additional period of up 6    to one year, subject to termination by further order of 7    the court at a hearing held under this Section and further 8    renewal by further order of the court under this Section.9(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-345, eff. 6-1-22; 10102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 11    (430 ILCS 67/55)12    Sec. 55. Data maintenance by law enforcement agencies. 13    (a) All sheriffs shall furnish to the Illinois State 14Police, daily, in the form and detail the Illinois State 15Police requires, copies of any recorded firearms restraining 16orders issued by the court, and any foreign orders of 17protection filed by the clerk of the court, and transmitted to 18the sheriff by the clerk of the court under Section 50. Each 19firearms restraining order shall be entered in the Law 20Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS) on the same day it is 21issued by the court. If an emergency firearms restraining 22order was issued in accordance with Section 35 of this Act, the 23order shall be entered in the Law Enforcement Agencies Data 24System (LEADS) as soon as possible after receipt from the 25clerk.  HB1040- 37 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    (b) The Illinois State Police shall maintain a complete 2and systematic record and index of all valid and recorded 3firearms restraining orders issued or filed under this Act. 4The data shall be used to inform all dispatchers and law 5enforcement officers at the scene of a violation of a firearms 6restraining order of the effective dates and terms of any 7recorded order of protection. 8    (c) The data, records, and transmittals required under 9this Section shall pertain to any valid emergency or plenary 106-month firearms restraining order, whether issued in a civil 11or criminal proceeding or authorized under the laws of another 12state, tribe, or United States territory. 13(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 15    Section 25. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 16changing Section 24-1 as follows: 17    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)18    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-822)19    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful use of weapons. 20    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful use of 21weapons when he knowingly:22        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 23    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 24    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon   HB1040- 38 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 2    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 3    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 4    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 5    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 6    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 7    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or8        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 9    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 10    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 11    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 12    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or13        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 14    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 15    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 16    used for religious worship; or 17        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 18    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 19    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 20    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 21    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 22    18 years of age or older; or23        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 24    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 25    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 26    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as   HB1040- 39 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 2    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 3    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 4    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 5    conditions:6            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or7            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or8            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 9        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 10        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 11        Owner's Identification Card; or12            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 13        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 14        been issued a currently valid license under the 15        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 16        (5) Sets a spring gun; or17        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 18    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 19    of any firearm; or20        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 21    carries:22            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 23        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 24        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 25        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 26        without manually reloading by a single function of the   HB1040- 40 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 2        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 3        or carries any combination of parts designed or 4        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 5        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 6        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 7        possession or under the control of a person;8            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 9        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 10        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 11        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 12        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 13        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 14        26 inches; or15            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 16        other container containing an explosive substance of 17        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 18        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 19        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or20        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 21    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 22    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 23    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 24    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 25    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 26    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of   HB1040- 41 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    unloaded firearms is conducted.2        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 3    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 4    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 5    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or6        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 7    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 8    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 9    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 10    identity; or11        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 12    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 13    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 14    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 15    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 16    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 17    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 18    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 19    another person as an invitee with that person's 20    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 21    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 22    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 23    one of the following conditions:24            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or25            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or26            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm   HB1040- 42 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 2        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 3        Owner's Identification Card; or4            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 5        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 6        been issued a currently valid license under the 7        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 8        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 9    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 10    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 11    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 12    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 13    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 14    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 15    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 16    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 17    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 18    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 19    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or20        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 21    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 22    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 23    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 24    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 25    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 26    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the   HB1040- 43 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 2    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 3    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 4    the propellant contained in such tube between the 5    projectile and the cap; or6        (12) (Blank); or7        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 8    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 9    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 10    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 11    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 12    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 13    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 14    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or15        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 16    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 17    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 18    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 19    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 20    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 21    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 22    or23        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 24    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or25        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 26    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in   HB1040- 44 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    violation of Section 24-1.9. 2    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 3subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 4subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 5commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 6violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 7Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 8subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 924-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 10violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a Class 2 felony 11and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 12than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the weapon is 13possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle as 14defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or on 15the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which case it shall 16be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a second or 17subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(8), 1824-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits a Class 3 19felony. A person convicted of a violation of subsection 2024-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 felony. The 21possession of each weapon or device in violation of this 22Section constitutes a single and separate violation.23    (c) Violations in specific places.24        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 25    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 26    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated   HB1040- 45 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 2    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 3    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 4    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 5    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 6    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 7    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 8    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 9    comprising any public park, on the real property 10    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 11    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 12    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 13    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 14    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 15    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 16    public transportation facility, or residential property 17    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 18    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 19    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 20    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 21    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.22        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 23    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 24    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 25    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 26    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a   HB1040- 46 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 2    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 3    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 4    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 5    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 6    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 7    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 8    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 9    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 10    students to or from school or a school related activity, 11    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 12    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 13    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 14    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 15    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 16    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 17    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 18    commits a Class 3 felony.19        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 20    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 21    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 22    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 23    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 24    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 25    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 26    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on   HB1040- 47 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 2    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 3    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 4    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 5    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 6    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 7    students to or from school or a school related activity, 8    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 9    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 10    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 11    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 12    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 13    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 14    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 15    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 16    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 17    of this State for the conduct of official business.18        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 19    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 20    security officers of such school, college, or university 21    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 22    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 23    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school 24    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 25    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 26    package.  HB1040- 48 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 2    means any public or private elementary or secondary 3    school, community college, college, or university.4        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 5    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 6    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 7    persons by means available to the general public, except 8    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 9    of the general public as passengers; and "public 10    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 11    where one may obtain public transportation. 12    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 13omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 14subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 15possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 16such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 17substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 18(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 19upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 20such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 21operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 22and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 23shall not apply to the driver.24    (e) Exemptions.25        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 26    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic   HB1040- 49 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 2    this Section.3        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 4    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 5    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 6    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 7    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 8    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 9    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 10    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 11    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 12    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 13    switchblade knives. 14(Source: P.A. 101-223, eff. 1-1-20; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-1116, eff. 1-10-23.) 16    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-822)17    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 18    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 19weapons when he knowingly:20        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 21    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 22    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 23    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 24    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 25    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure   HB1040- 50 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 2    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 3    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 4    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or5        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 6    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 7    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 8    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 9    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or10        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 11    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church, 12    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 13    used for religious worship; or 14        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 15    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 16    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 17    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 18    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 19    18 years of age or older; or20        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 21    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 22    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 23    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 24    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 25    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 26    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect   HB1040- 51 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 2    conditions:3            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or4            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or5            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 6        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 7        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 8        Owner's Identification Card; or9            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 10        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 11        been issued a currently valid license under the 12        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 13        (5) Sets a spring gun; or14        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 15    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 16    of any firearm; or17        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 18    carries:19            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 20        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 21        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 22        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 23        without manually reloading by a single function of the 24        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 25        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 26        or carries any combination of parts designed or   HB1040- 52 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 2        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 3        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 4        possession or under the control of a person;5            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 6        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 7        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 8        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 9        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 10        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 11        26 inches; or12            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 13        other container containing an explosive substance of 14        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 15        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 16        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or17        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 18    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 19    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 20    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 21    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 22    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 23    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 24    unloaded firearms is conducted.25        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 26    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit   HB1040- 53 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 2    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or3        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 4    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 5    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 6    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 7    identity; or8        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 9    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 10    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 11    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or 12    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 13    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 14    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 15    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 16    another person as an invitee with that person's 17    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 18    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 19    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 20    one of the following conditions:21            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or22            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or23            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 24        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 25        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 26        Owner's Identification Card; or  HB1040- 54 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 2        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 3        been issued a currently valid license under the 4        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 5        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 6    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 7    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 8    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 9    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 10    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 11    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any 12    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 13    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 14    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 15    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 16    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or17        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 18    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 19    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 20    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 21    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 22    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 23    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 24    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 25    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 26    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with   HB1040- 55 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    the propellant contained in such tube between the 2    projectile and the cap; or3        (12) (Blank); or4        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 5    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 6    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 7    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 8    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 9    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 10    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 11    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or12        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 13    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 14    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 15    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 16    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 17    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 18    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 19    or20        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 21    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or22        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 23    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 24    violation of Section 24-1.9. 25    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 26subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10),   HB1040- 56 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1subsection 24-1(a)(11), or subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 224-1(a)(15) commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted 3of a violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits 4a Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 5subsection 24-1(a)(6), or 24-1(a)(7)(ii) , 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 624-1(a)(16) or (iii) commits a Class 3 felony. A person 7convicted of a violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a 8Class 2 felony and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment 9of not less than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the 10weapon is possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor 11vehicle as defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, or on the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which 13case it shall be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a 14second or subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 1524-1(a)(8), 24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits 16a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a violation of 17subsection 24-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 18felony. The possession of each weapon or device in violation 19of this Section constitutes a single and separate violation.20    (c) Violations in specific places.21        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 22    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 23    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 24    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 25    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 26    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the   HB1040- 57 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 2    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 3    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 4    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 5    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 6    comprising any public park, on the real property 7    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 8    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 9    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 10    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 11    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real 12    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 13    public transportation facility, or residential property 14    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 15    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 16    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 17    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 18    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.19        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 20    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 21    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 22    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 23    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 24    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 25    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 26    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year,   HB1040- 58 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 2    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 3    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 4    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 5    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 6    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 7    students to or from school or a school related activity, 8    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 9    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 10    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 11    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 12    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 13    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 14    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 15    commits a Class 3 felony.16        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 17    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 18    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 19    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 20    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 21    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 22    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 23    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 24    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 25    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 26    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development,   HB1040- 59 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 2    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 3    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 4    students to or from school or a school related activity, 5    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 6    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 7    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 8    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 9    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 10    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 11    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 12    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 13    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 14    of this State for the conduct of official business.15        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 16    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 17    security officers of such school, college, or university 18    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 19    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 20    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school 21    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 22    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 23    package.24        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 25    means any public or private elementary or secondary 26    school, community college, college, or university.  HB1040- 60 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 2    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 3    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 4    persons by means available to the general public, except 5    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance 6    of the general public as passengers; and "public 7    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 8    where one may obtain public transportation. 9    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 10omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 11subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 12possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 13such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 14substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 15(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 16upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 17such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 18operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 19and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 20shall not apply to the driver.21    (e) Exemptions.22        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 23    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 24    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 25    this Section.26        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a)   HB1040- 61 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 2    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 3    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 4    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 5    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not 6    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 7    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 8    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 9    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 10    switchblade knives. 11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 12103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 13    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.9 rep.)14    (720 ILCS 5/24-1.10 rep.)15    Section 30. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 16repealing Sections 24-1.9 and 24-1.10. 17    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 18changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 19that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 20represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 21not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 22made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 23Public Act. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   HB1040- 62 -LRB104 03254 RLC 13276 b1becoming law.